Missouri, session 2026, SB1596.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 354, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 354.718, to read as
follows:
354.718. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Dental loss ratio", the percentage of the amount
of premiums received by a dental plan expended on actual
patient care rather than overhead or administrative costs,
as determined by the following fraction:
(a) The numerator shall be the amount expended for
clinical dental services provided to dental plan enrollees,
including payments under capitation contracts with dental
providers, during the reporting year together with unpaid
claim reserves for dental services performed during the
reporting year but not yet paid. The numerator shall not
include:
a. Administrative costs including, but not limited to,
infrastructure costs, personnel costs, or broker payments;
b. Amounts paid to third-party vendors for secondary
network savings;

SB 1596 2
c. Amounts paid to third-party vendors for network
development, administrative fees, claims processing, and
utilization management;
d. Amounts paid to providers for professional or
administrative services that do not represent compensation
or reimbursement for covered services provided to an
enrollee including, but not limited to, dental record
copying costs, attorney's fees, subrogation vendor fees, and
compensation to paraprofessionals, janitors, quality
assurance analysts, administrative supervisors, secretaries
to dental personnel, and dental record clerks; or
e. Overpayments made by the provider that were
recovered by the dental plan and not previously reported on
any dental loss ratio report; and
(b) The denominator shall be all earned premiums
received by the dental plan for dental services, excluding
federal and state taxes; licensing fees; regulatory fees;
payments or receipts for risk adjustment, risk corridors,
and reinsurance; community benefit expenditures, as defined
in 45 CFR 158.162(c); and any other payments required by
federal law;
(2) "Dental plan", any health benefit plan, or portion
of a health benefit plan, that issues, sells, renews, or
offers a contract covering dental care services. The term
"dental plan" shall not include any health benefit plan for
health care services under MO HealthNet, the state
children's health insurance program authorized in sections
208.631 to 208.658, or any other state-sponsored health
insurance program.
2. (1) A dental plan shall file with the department
of commerce and insurance a dental loss ratio report for
each calendar year during which the dental plan provided

SB 1596 3
dental coverage containing the same information as required
in the 2013 federal dental loss ratio annual reporting form
(CMS-10418). All terms used in the dental loss ratio annual
report shall have the same meanings as used in the federal
Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 300gg-18, and
45 CFR Part 158.
(2) The dental loss ratio report shall be filed before
March first of each year for the previous calendar year. If
the department of commerce and insurance requires data
verification of the dental loss ratio report, it shall give
the dental plan thirty days' notice of the additional
information and data required to be submitted to the
department. The dental plan shall submit the information
requested within thirty days of such notice. The department
shall be deemed to have approved all dental loss ratio
reports within ninety days of the filing of the reports
unless a dental plan is notified otherwise.
(3) The department of commerce and insurance shall
make available to the public all the data provided to the
department in accordance with this section.
3. A dental plan shall provide an annual rebate to
each enrollee, on a pro rata basis, to the extent the dental
loss ratio is less than eighty-five percent before August
first of the year following the year for which the dental
loss ratio report was issued. The total annual rebate is
the excess revenue expended by the dental plan on overhead
or administrative costs, as determined by the amount by
which the denominator of the dental loss ratio exceeds the
numerator.
4. Any failure to rebate the amount prescribed in
subsection 3 of this section by a dental plan not required

SB 1596 4
to be licensed by the department of commerce and insurance
shall be deemed an unlawful practice under section 407.020.
✓